Illinois, session 104th, HB4231.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 10-10 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/10-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-10)7    Sec. 10-10. Within 24 hours after the receipt of the 8certificate of nomination or nomination papers or proposed 9question of public policy, as the case may be, and the 10objector's petition, the chair of the electoral board other 11than the State Board of Elections shall send a call by 12registered or certified mail: to each of the members of the 13electoral board; to the objector who filed the objector's 14petition; either to the candidate whose certificate of 15nomination or nomination papers are objected to or to the 16principal proponent or attorney for proponents of a question 17of public policy, as the case may be, whose petitions are 18objected to; to the election authority to whom the ballot is 19certified; and to the appropriate county clerk. The chair of 20the electoral board other than the State Board of Elections 21shall also cause the sheriff of the county or counties in which 22such officers and persons reside to serve a copy of such call 23upon each of such officers and persons, which call shall set   HB4231- 2 -LRB104 16762 SPS 30171 b1out the fact that the electoral board is required to meet to 2hear and pass upon the objections to nominations made for the 3office, designating it, and shall state the day, hour and 4place at which the electoral board shall meet for the purpose, 5which place shall be in the county court house in the county in 6the case of the County Officers Electoral Board, the Municipal 7Officers Electoral Board, the Township Officers Electoral 8Board or the Education Officers Electoral Board, except that 9the Municipal Officers Electoral Board, the Township Officers 10Electoral Board, and the Education Officers Electoral Board 11may meet at the location where the governing body of the 12municipality, township, or community college district, 13respectively, holds its regularly scheduled meetings, if that 14location is available; provided that voter records may be 15removed from the offices of an election authority only at the 16discretion and under the supervision of the election 17authority. In those cases where the State Board of Elections 18is the electoral board designated under Section 10-9, the 19chair of the State Board of Elections shall, within 24 hours 20after the receipt of the certificate of nomination or 21nomination papers or petitions for a proposed amendment to 22Article IV of the Constitution or proposed statewide question 23of public policy, send a call by registered or certified mail 24to the objector who files the objector's petition, and either 25to the candidate whose certificate of nomination or nomination 26papers are objected to or to the principal proponent or   HB4231- 3 -LRB104 16762 SPS 30171 b1attorney for proponents of the proposed Constitutional 2amendment or statewide question of public policy and shall 3state the day, hour, and place at which the electoral board 4shall meet for the purpose, which place may be in the Capitol 5Building or in the principal or permanent branch office of the 6State Board. The day of the meeting shall not be less than 3 7nor more than 5 days after the receipt of the certificate of 8nomination or nomination papers and the objector's petition by 9the chair of the electoral board.10    The electoral board shall have the power to administer 11oaths and to subpoena and examine witnesses and, at the 12request of either party and only upon a vote by a majority of 13its members, may authorize the chair to issue subpoenas 14requiring the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces 15tecum requiring the production of such books, papers, records 16and documents as may be evidence of any matter under inquiry 17before the electoral board, in the same manner as witnesses 18are subpoenaed in the Circuit Court.19    Service of such subpoenas shall be made by any sheriff or 20other person in the same manner as in cases in such court and 21the fees of such sheriff shall be the same as is provided by 22law, and shall be paid by the objector or candidate who causes 23the issuance of the subpoena. In case any person so served 24shall knowingly neglect or refuse to obey any such subpoena, 25or to testify, the electoral board shall at once file a 26petition in the circuit court of the county in which such   HB4231- 4 -LRB104 16762 SPS 30171 b1hearing is to be heard, or has been attempted to be heard, 2setting forth the facts, of such knowing refusal or neglect, 3and accompanying the petition with a copy of the citation and 4the answer, if one has been filed, together with a copy of the 5subpoena and the return of service thereon, and shall apply 6for an order of court requiring such person to attend and 7testify, and forthwith produce books and papers, before the 8electoral board. Any circuit court of the state, excluding the 9judge who is sitting on the electoral board, upon such showing 10shall order such person to appear and testify, and to 11forthwith produce such books and papers, before the electoral 12board at a place to be fixed by the court. If such person shall 13knowingly fail or refuse to obey such order of the court 14without lawful excuse, the court shall punish him or her by 15fine and imprisonment, as the nature of the case may require 16and may be lawful in cases of contempt of court.17    The electoral board on the first day of its meeting shall 18adopt rules of procedure for the introduction of evidence and 19the presentation of arguments and may, in its discretion, 20provide for the filing of briefs by the parties to the 21objection or by other interested persons.22    In the event of a State Electoral Board hearing on 23objections to a petition for an amendment to Article IV of the 24Constitution pursuant to Section 3 of Article XIV of the 25Constitution, or to a petition for a question of public policy 26to be submitted to the voters of the entire State, the   HB4231- 5 -LRB104 16762 SPS 30171 b1certificates of the county clerks and boards of election 2commissioners showing the results of the random sample of 3signatures on the petition shall be prima facie valid and 4accurate, and shall be presumed to establish the number of 5valid and invalid signatures on the petition sheets reviewed 6in the random sample, as prescribed in Section 28-11 and 28-12 7of this Code. Either party, however, may introduce evidence at 8such hearing to dispute the findings as to particular 9signatures. In addition to the foregoing, in the absence of 10competent evidence presented at such hearing by a party 11substantially challenging the results of a random sample, or 12showing a different result obtained by an additional sample, 13this certificate of a county clerk or board of election 14commissioners shall be presumed to establish the ratio of 15valid to invalid signatures within the particular election 16jurisdiction.17    The electoral board shall take up the question as to 18whether or not the certificate of nomination or nomination 19papers or petitions are in proper form, and whether or not they 20were filed within the time and under the conditions required 21by law, and whether or not they are the genuine certificate of 22nomination or nomination papers or petitions which they 23purport to be, and whether or not in the case of the 24certificate of nomination in question it represents accurately 25the decision of the caucus or convention issuing it, and in 26general shall decide whether or not the certificate of   HB4231- 6 -LRB104 16762 SPS 30171 b1nomination or nominating papers or petitions on file are valid 2or whether the objections thereto should be sustained and the 3decision of a majority of the electoral board shall be final 4subject to judicial review as provided in Section 10-10.1. The 5electoral board must state its findings in writing and must 6state in writing which objections, if any, it has sustained. A 7copy of the decision shall be served upon the parties to the 8proceedings in open proceedings before the electoral board. If 9a party does not appear for receipt of the decision, the 10decision shall be deemed to have been served on the absent 11party on the date when a copy of the decision is personally 12delivered or on the date when a copy of the decision is 13deposited in the United States mail, in a sealed envelope or 14package, with postage prepaid, addressed to each party 15affected by the decision or to such party's attorney of 16record, if any, at the address on record for such person in the 17files of the electoral board. 18    If the electoral board determines that an objection 19brought under this Section is frivolous, the candidate may 20file a petition with the circuit court to recover reasonable 21attorney's fees and costs from the objector.22    Upon the expiration of the period within which a 23proceeding for judicial review must be commenced under Section 2410-10.1, the electoral board shall, unless a proceeding for 25judicial review has been commenced within such period, 26transmit, by registered or certified mail, a certified copy of   HB4231- 7 -LRB104 16762 SPS 30171 b1its ruling, together with the original certificate of 2nomination or nomination papers or petitions and the original 3objector's petition, to the officer or board with whom the 4certificate of nomination or nomination papers or petitions, 5as objected to, were on file and to the election authority to 6whom the ballot is certified and the appropriate county clerk, 7and such officer or board shall abide by and comply with the 8ruling so made to all intents and purposes.9(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.)